Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 7 Retirement Allowances, Disability Benefits, and Spouses’ Benefits
47-3-126.4.
Postretirement benefit for beneficiary.

As used in this Code section, the term “beneficiary” shall have the meaning specified in paragraph (7) of Code Section 47-3-1.

Subject to the limitations of subsection (c) of this Code section, effective July 1, 2006, the monthly retirement benefit of each beneficiary shall be increased by a percentage which varies in accordance with the time of retirement as follows:

Click to view

The full percentage increase provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section shall apply only to those beneficiaries who had 20 or more years of creditable service at the time of retirement. For those beneficiaries who had at least ten but less than 20 years of creditable service at the time of retirement, the monthly benefit increase provided for by subsection (b) of this Code section shall be reduced by 5 percent for each year less than 20 years of creditable service. Beneficiaries who had less than ten years of creditable service shall not receive an increase in their monthly retirement benefit under this Code section.

Any county, municipal, or local board of education is authorized, but not required, to provide a postretirement benefit increase as provided in this Code section to any teacher who retired under a public retirement system or fund maintained by such county, municipal, or local board of education, provided that:

The actuary for the fund certifies that such increase would not result in any unfunded accrued liability as to such retirement system; or

The affected political subdivision appropriates sufficient funds to cover the actuarial cost of granting such benefit.

Time of Retirement Percentage Increase Prior to July 1, 1974 10.0 July 1, 1974, through June 30, 1982 6.0 July 1, 1982, through June 30, 1987 2.0 After June 30, 1987 0.0

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-126.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 696, § 1/HB 400.

47-3-127.
Effect of restoration to service on retirement allowances; creditable service after restoration to service.

If, except as provided in Code Section 47-3-127.1, a beneficiary is restored to service as a teacher, he or she may elect:

Cessation of his or her retirement allowance, in which case he or she shall again become a contributing member of the retirement system and be governed by the retirement provisions of this chapter; or

Not to reinstate his or her membership in the retirement system, in which case his or her retirement benefits shall be suspended during the period of time he or she is restored to service. Upon cessation of such service, his or her prior retirement allowance shall be resumed.

If the returning beneficiary fails to elect either choice, his or her status shall be as if he or she had elected paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any prior service certificate on the basis of which a member’s creditable service was computed at the time of his retirement shall be restored to full force and effect upon his restoration to service. Upon his subsequent retirement he shall be credited with all his service as a member, including service rendered after restoration to service. If he is restored to service on or after attaining age 50, his retirement benefits upon subsequent retirement shall not exceed the sum of the pension which he was receiving immediately prior to his last restoration to membership and the pension payable in respect to his subsequent service, except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, provided that if he has served at least two school years as a contributing member after restoration to service and if he reimburses the retirement system for any retirement benefits received from the retirement system during his retirement, plus regular interest, such person shall receive credit for any prior creditable service; and upon subsequent retirement he shall be credited with all his service as a member, which service shall all be counted in determining his retirement benefits upon subsequent retirement. He shall not be limited to the retirement benefits he was receiving prior to his last restoration to membership in the retirement system.

The retirement benefits payable to a beneficiary who retired prior to July 1, 1961, who was restored to service and who subsequently retired on or after July 1, 1961, shall be determined under the pension provisions in effect at the time of that subsequent retirement, provided that such member completed at least one year of creditable service subsequent to such restoration to service.

Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, a beneficiary may elect to return to service on an hourly basis as a classroom aide, provided such service is less than full time, or as a substitute teacher without reinstating his membership in the system. If such election is made, he shall continue to receive his retirement benefits and any postretirement benefit adjustments granted, if any, during such part-time service. Such part-time service shall not constitute creditable service and such beneficiary shall not be entitled to a recomputation of retirement benefits upon a cessation of part-time service.

A beneficiary of this retirement system shall be deemed to be restored to service within the meaning of this Code section if, except as otherwise provided in Code Section 47-3-127.1, such beneficiary is employed by an employer:

In a position previously held by a teacher; or

In a capacity which would normally be held by a teacher, as determined by the board of trustees, whether employed directly or indirectly, for which the compensation is greater than one-half of the beneficiary’s average annual compensation used to calculate his or her retirement benefit or the beneficiary’s final compensation at the time of his or her retirement, whichever is larger; provided, however, that such amount shall be increased by any annual cost-of-living adjustment reflected in the state teacher salary schedule.

If an employer employs a beneficiary in any manner specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection during the calendar month of the effective date of the beneficiary’s retirement, the employer shall reimburse the retirement system for all benefits wrongly paid to the beneficiary.

If an employer employs a beneficiary in any manner specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection any time after the last day of the calendar month of the effective date of the beneficiary’s retirement, the employer shall so notify the board of trustees, stating the beneficiary’s name, salary, number of hours, whether the beneficiary is employed as a teacher, and such other information as the board of trustees requests, and the employer shall reimburse the retirement system for all benefits wrongly paid to the beneficiary.

It shall be the duty of a beneficiary of this retirement system to notify an employer of his or her status as a beneficiary prior to accepting employment with that employer. If a beneficiary fails to so notify an employer and as a result the employer becomes obligated to this retirement system pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection, the beneficiary shall be liable to the employer for any amount the employer is obligated to pay to this retirement system.

If an employer who is obligated to this retirement system pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection fails to pay the amount due, such amount shall be deducted from any funds payable to the employer by the state, including without limitation the Department of Education and the board of regents, and paid to the board of trustees of this retirement system.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 6; Ga. L. 1962, p. 723, § 15; Ga. L. 1969, p. 431, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 896, § 4; Ga. L. 1983, p. 949, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 620, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 866, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 585, §§ 1, 2.

47-3-127.1.
Full-time employment of beneficiaries permitted under limited conditions; required employer contributions; areas of highest need.

From July 1, 2022, until June 30, 2026, notwithstanding the provisions of Code Section 47-3-127, to the extent and under the conditions provided for in this Code section, a public school system may employ a beneficiary who has obtained 30 years of creditable service in this retirement system in a full-time capacity as a certified teacher of pre-kindergarten through grade 12 who has as his or her primary responsibility the academic instruction of students in a classroom in an area of highest need determined for the RESA to which such public school system is assigned, provided that at least one year has expired from the effective date of such beneficiary’s retirement and he or she was not restored to service as a teacher pursuant to Code Section 47-3-127 during such period of time.

An individual employed as described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall remain a beneficiary and shall continue to receive his or her retirement allowance and any postretirement benefit adjustments for which he or she is eligible; provided, however, that such service shall not constitute creditable service and shall not entitle such beneficiary to a recomputation of retirement benefits upon cessation of such service.

It shall be the duty of each beneficiary to notify an employer of his or her status as a beneficiary prior to accepting employment with such employer.

Within 30 days of employing a beneficiary pursuant to this Code section, such employer shall notify the board of trustees of such beneficiary’s name, the amount of his or her earnable compensation, a description of any other forms of remuneration to be made, the number of hours to be worked, job responsibilities, and other such information as the board of trustees may prescribe.

An employer that employs a beneficiary pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall pay to the retirement system an amount equal to the product of:

The combination of the rate required by this chapter for employer contributions and employee contributions; and

The earnable compensation of such beneficiary.

A beneficiary shall not receive creditable service from or access to contributions made as a result of payments required by paragraph (2) of this subsection, and he or she shall be considered by the retirement system solely as a beneficiary.

If an employer that is obligated to make contributions or reimbursements to the retirement system pursuant to this Code section fails to make such contributions, any unpaid amounts shall be deducted from any funds payable to such employer by the state, including without limitation the Department of Education and the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, and shall be paid to the retirement system.

As used in this Code section, “area of highest need” means one of the three content areas for which there are the greatest percentages of unfilled positions for classroom teachers in a RESA.

The areas of highest need shall be determined for each RESA annually by the Department of Education after consultation with the Professional Standards Commission. Such determinations shall be based upon a five-year average review of a survey reported by local school systems to the Department of Education. The areas of highest need for each RESA shall be reported to the retirement system on an annual basis beginning July 1, 2022, and ending July 1, 2025.

Prior to July 1, 2025, the state auditor shall conduct and publish a performance audit concerning the provisions of this Code section to include a determination of the value and necessity of the full-time employment of beneficiaries as permitted by this Code section, as well as the effects of such employment on the local school systems, the Teachers Retirement System of Georgia, and the teacher workforce as a whole for this state.

The provisions of this Code section shall not become part of the employment contract and shall be subject to future legislation.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-3-127.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 162, § 1/HB 385.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2022,
“as well as” was substituted for “as well” in the middle of subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to the employment of retired teachers in teaching or other capacities. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, §

47-3-127.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 585, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 139, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 107, § 22; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1061, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 533, § 1/HB 495; Ga. L. 2008, p. 1094, § 1/SB 327; Ga. L. 2009, p. 368, § 1/SB 48; Ga. L. 2012, p. 667, § 1/HB 208. It was repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 667, § 1/HB 208, effective June 30, 2013.

47-3-128.
Payment of accumulated contributions upon request after termination of membership; payment of taxable portion to eligible retirement plan.

If a person’s membership ceases other than by death or retirement from this retirement system, the amount of his or her accumulated contributions to this retirement system shall be payable to the member upon such person’s request after the date the person has terminated employment with a school system, institution of higher learning, or agency covered by this retirement system. The board of trustees shall allow a person requesting such payment of accumulated contributions to elect to have the taxable portion of such payment made directly to an eligible retirement plan as defined in the federal Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 5; Ga. L. 1964, p. 669, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 513, § 3; Ga. L. 1969, p. 388, § 3; Ga. L. 1971, p. 620, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 732, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 535, § 15/HB 460.

47-3-129.
Rights when retire before 60 with ten years of service or 20 years before 1954; reestablishment of credits earned before that retirement.

Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, the right to the service retirement benefit under this chapter shall vest in a member who withdraws from service prior to attaining 60 years of age, provided that he has completed at least ten years of creditable service and has not withdrawn his contributions. Such member shall, upon filing an application as provided in this chapter, become entitled to service retirement benefit upon his attainment of the age of 60 or at his option at any date subsequent thereto. The service retirement benefit of any such member shall be as set forth in this chapter, based on the total credits accrued at the date of his withdrawal from service; or, if such member should die before filing such application, the maximum benefits payable shall be limited to the member’s accumulated contributions at the time of his withdrawal from service; and nothing in this chapter shall be construed as providing for any benefits prior to attaining age 60, other than a return of the contributions in case of death. Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, this Code section shall inure retroactively to the benefit of all members who completed at least 20 years’ creditable service prior to January 1, 1954, and who have not withdrawn their contributions.

If a member returns to active service in the public schools or the University System of Georgia for one year or more prior to age 60, he may reestablish such credits that he had at the time he withdrew from active service and such credits in which he had a vested right to a service retirement benefit under this Code section by paying a fee of 25 percent of his last annual salary prior to freezing his credits or the applicable accrued regular interest on his annuity account from the date of freezing to date of payment, whichever is greater.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 690, § 1; Ga. L. 1961, p. 352, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 542, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 784, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1023, §§ 1, 7; Ga. L. 1977, p. 825, § 5; Ga. L. 2000, p. 131, § 1.

47-3-130.
Commencement of benefits under this retirement system; retirement after January 1, 1943, but before the commencement date.

No member shall retire or receive benefits under this retirement system prior to the commencement date; but any person eligible for service retirement or disability benefits after January 1, 1943, and prior to the commencement date shall be entitled to the benefits provided by this chapter, even though he is not a teacher on the commencement date.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 640, § 5.